src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VI9-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:déanaim		NegImper;
+2P+Sg:déan		NegImper;
+3P+Sg:déanadh		NegImper;
+1P+Pl:déanaimis 	NegImper;
+2P+Pl:déanaigí		NegImper;
+3P+Pl:déanaidís	NegImper;
+Auto:déantar		NegImper;


!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI10	! FAIGH (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI10-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI10-PastInd;
+FutInd:0	VI10-FutInd;
+FutInd:0	VI10-FutIndDep;
+PastImp:0	VI10-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI10-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood - Indep.
+Cond:0		VI10-CondDep;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood - Depend.

+PresSubj:0	VI10-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI10-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI10-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordafaigheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI10-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:faigheann		SufNegQ;
!!0:faigheanns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:faighim		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:faighimse		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:faighimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:faighimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:faightear		NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:fhaigheas		#; 

LEXICON VI10-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

0:fuair			NegQIrreg;		
+1P+Sg:fuaireas		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Sg+Emph:fuaireas-sa		NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg:fuairis		NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg+Emph:fuairis-se		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl:fuaireamar	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl+Emph:fuaireamarna	NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl:fuaireadar	NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl+Emph:fuaireadarsan	NegQIrreg;
+Auto:fuarthas	  	NegQIrreg;		

LEXICON VI10-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:gheobhaidh		#;
+1P+Pl:gheobhaimid	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph:gheobhaimidne	#;
+Auto:gheofar		#;		
+Rel:gheobhas		#;		

LEXICON VI10-FutIndDep		! Past Tense - Aimsir  Spléach

+Dep:faighidh			NegQDep;		
+Dep+1P+Pl:faighimid	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph:faighimidne	NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:faighfear		NegQDep;		

LEXICON VI10-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:faigheadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:faighinn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:faighteá	NegQ2;
!!!!+3P+Sg:faigheadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:faighimis	NegQ2;
!!!!+2P+Pl:faigheadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:faighidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:faightí 	NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI10-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:gheobhadh	#;
+1P+Sg:gheobhainn	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph:gheobhainnse	#;
+2P+Sg:gheofá		#;
+2P+Sg+Emph:gheofása		#;
!!!!+3P+Sg:gheobhadh	#;
+1P+Pl:gheobhaimis	#;
!!!!+2P+Pl:gheobhadh	#;
+3P+Pl:gheobhaidís	#;
+Auto:gheofaí 		#;		

LEXICON VI10-CondDep		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

+Dep:faigheadh	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Sg:faighinn		NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Sg+Emph:faighinnse		NegQDep;
+Dep+2P+Sg:faighfeá		NegQDep;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Emph:faighfeása		NegQDep;
!!!!+Dep+3P+Sg:faigheadh	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl:faighimis	NegQDep;
!!!!+Dep+2P+Pl:faigheadh	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl:faighidís	NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:faighfí 		NegQDep;		


LEXICON VI10-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láfaigh.
0:faighe		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:faighimid	NegSubj;
+Auto:faightear 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI10-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:faighinn		NegQ;
+2P+Sg:faighteá		NegQ;
+3P+Sg:faigheadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:faighimis	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:faigheadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:faighidís	NegQ;
+Auto:faightí		NegQ;		



LEXICON VI10-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordafaigheach

+1P+Sg:faighim	 NegImper;
+2P+Sg:faigh	 NegImper;
+3P+Sg:faigheadh NegImper;
+1P+Pl:faighimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:faighigí	 NegImper;
+3P+Pl:faighidís NegImper;
+Auto:faightear  NegImper;


!**************************************************************************
LEXICON VI10a	! GEIBH (Irregular)

+PresInd:0	VI10a-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastImp:0	VI10a-PastImp;

LEXICON VI10a-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:geibheann		SufNegQ;
!!0:geibheanns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:geibhim		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:geibhimse		NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:geibhimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:geibhtear		NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:gheibheas		#; 


LEXICON VI10a-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:geibheadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:geibhinn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:geibhteá	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:geibhimis	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:geibhidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:geibhtí 	NegQ2;		

!**************************************************************************

LEXICON VI11	! BÍ (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI11-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PresInd:0	VI11-PresIndRel;
+PresInd:0	VI11-PresIndDepNeg;
+PresInd:0	VI11-PresIndDep;
+PresImp:0	VI11-PresImp;

+PastInd:0	VI11-PastInd;
+PastInd:0	VI11-PastIndDep;

+FutInd:0	VI11-FutInd;

+PastImp:0	VI11-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI11-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood - Indep.

+PresSubj:0	VI11-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI11-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI11-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood



LEXICON VI11-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:tá			#;
+Typo:ta			#;	! common typo
+CM:tánn		#;
+Len+CM:thá		#;
+1P+Sg:táim		#;
+1P+Sg+Emph:táimse	#;
+2P+Sg+CM:taoi		#;
+2P+Sg+CM:táir		#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+CM:táirse	#;
+1P+Pl:táimid		#;
+1P+Pl+Emph:táimidne	#;
+3P+Pl+CM:táid		#;
+Auto:táthar		#;

LEXICON VI11-PresIndRel		! Present Relative  - Láithreach Coibhneasta
+Rel:atá		#;
+Rel+Len+CM:athá	#;	! Munster variation
+Rel+Typo:ata		#;	! common typo
+1P+Sg+Rel:atáim	#;
+1P+Sg+Rel+Len+CM:atháim	#;	! Munster variation
+1P+Sg+Rel+Emph:atáimse	#;
+1P+Sg+Rel+Emph+Len+CM:atháimse	#;	! Munster variation
+1P+Pl+Rel:atáimid	#;
+1P+Pl+Rel+Len+CM:atháimid	#;	! Munster variation
+1P+Pl+Rel+Emph:atáimidne	#;
+1P+Pl+Rel+Emph+Len+CM:atháimidne	#;	! Munster variation
+Auto+Rel:atáthar	#; 	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Auto+Rel+Len+CM:atháthar	#; 	! Munster variation

LEXICON VI11-PresIndDepNeg	! Present Dependant Neg. - Láith. Spléach (ní)
+Neg:níl		#;
+Neg:níleann+CM		#;
+1P+Sg+Neg:nílim	#;
+1P+Sg+Neg+Emph:nílimse	#;
+2P+Sg+Neg+CM:nílir	#;
+2P+Sg+Neg+Emph+CM:nílirse	#;
+1P+Pl+Neg:nílimid	#;
+1P+Pl+Neg+Emph:nílimidne	#;
+3P+Pl+Neg+CM:nílid	#;
+Auto+Neg:níltear	#;

LEXICON VI11-PresIndDep		! Present Dependant non Neg. - Láith. Spléach
+Dep+Ecl:bhfuil		#;
+Dep+Q+Ecl:bhfuil		#;
+Dep+Neg+Ecl:bhfuil		#;
+Dep+NegQ+Ecl:bhfuil		#;
+Dep+NegQ+CM:fuil		#;	! CM forms from Dillon Teach Yourself Irish

+Dep+1P+Sg+Ecl:bhfuilim		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+Q+Ecl:bhfuilim		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+NegQ+Ecl:bhfuilim		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+NegQ+Ecl+CM:fuilim		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimse		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+Q+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimse		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+NegQ+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimse		#;
+Dep+1P+Sg+NegQ+Emph+Ecl+CM:fuilimse		#;

+Dep+2P+Sg+Ecl+CM:bhfuilir		#;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Q+Ecl+CM:bhfuilir		#;
+Dep+2P+Sg+NegQ+Ecl+CM:fuilir		#;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Emph+Ecl+CM:bhfuilirse		#;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Q+Emph+Ecl+CM:bhfuilirse		#;
+Dep+2P+Sg+NegQ+Emph+Ecl+CM:fuilirse		#;


+Dep+1P+Pl+Ecl:bhfuilimid	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Q+Ecl:bhfuilimid	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+NegQ+Ecl:bhfuilimid	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+NegQ+Ecl+CM:fuilimid	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimidne	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Q+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimidne	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+NegQ+Emph+Ecl:bhfuilimidne	#;
+Dep+1P+Pl+NegQ+Emph+Ecl+CM:fuilimidne	#;

+Dep+3P+Pl+Ecl+CM:bhfuilid	#;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Q+Ecl+CM:bhfuilid	#;
+Dep+3P+Pl+NegQ+Ecl+CM:fuilid	#;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Emph+Ecl+CM:bhfuilidne	#;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Q+Emph+Ecl+CM:bhfuilidne	#;
+Dep+3P+Pl+NegQ+Emph+Ecl+CM:fuilidne	#;

+Dep+Auto+Ecl:bhfuiltear	#;
+Dep+Auto+Q+Ecl:bhfuiltear	#;
+Dep+Auto+NegQ+Ecl:bhfuiltear	#;

 LEXICON VI11-PresImp	! Present Imperfect  - GhnáthLáithreach
0:bíonn		SufNegQ;
!+Len:bhíonn		SufNegQ; ! Trond: bhíonn, out due to change in affixes/verbs.lexc
!!0:bíonns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:bím	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:bímse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:bímid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:bímidne	NegQ;
+Auto:bítear 	NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:bhíos	#;

LEXICON VI11-PastIndDep		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+Dep:raibh		NegQDep;
+Dep+Var:rabh		NegQDep;	! (Added CW 09/08)
+Dep+1P+Sg:rabhas	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Sg+Emph:rabhas-sa	NegQDep;
+Dep+2P+Sg:rabhais	NegQDep;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Emph:rabhais-se	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl:rabhamar	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph:rabhamarna	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl:rabhadar	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Emph:rabhadarsan	NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:rabhthas  NegQDep;		
